src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/A-vuaeqmes_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - vuäʹmes class A4e: # Adjective 'old' - full paradigm
    vuäʹmes+A+Sg+Nom: vuäʹmes
    vuäʹmes+A+Pl+Nom: vuämˈmaz
    vuäʹmes+A+Attr: vuäʹmˈm
    vuäʹmes+A+Comp+Attr: vuämˈmsab
    vuäʹmes+A+Superl+Attr: vuämˈmsumus
